Washington statutes.
RCW 18.71.200

Physician's trained advanced emergency medical technician and paramedic—Definition.

As used in this chapter, a "physician's trained advanced emergency medical technician and paramedic" means a person who:

(1) Has successfully completed an emergency medical technician course as described in chapter 18.73 RCW;

(2) Is trained under the supervision of an approved medical program director according to training standards prescribed in rule to perform specific phases of advanced cardiac and trauma life support under written or oral authorization of an approved licensed physician; and

(3) Has been examined and certified as a physician's trained advanced emergency medical technician and paramedic, by level, by the University of Washington's school of medicine or the department of health.

[ 2015 c 93 s 2; 1995 c 65 s 2; 1991 c 3 s 165; 1986 c 259 s 111; 1983 c 112 s 1; 1977 c 55 s 2; 1973 1st ex.s. c 52 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 305 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 259: See note following RCW 18.130.010.

Effective date—1973 1st ex.s. c 52: See note following RCW 43.22.010.